Hawaii statutes.
§651-10 Indemnity for police officer.
If the police officer has any reasonable doubt as to the ownership of the
property, or as to its liability to be taken on the writ, the police officer
may require sufficient security to indemnify the police officer for attaching
it. [L 1905, c 84, §10; RL 1925, §2814; RL 1935, §4199; RL 1945, §10150; RL
1955, §233-10; HRS §651-10; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next